Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3129
Tax credit; application; contents.

To receive tax credits under the Cast and Crew Nebraska Act, the production company shall submit an application to the department on a form prescribed by the department after the completion of the qualified production activity. Such application shall contain the following information:

(1) The total amount of qualifying expenditures for the qualified production activity;

(2) The production expenditure report for the qualified production activity;

(3) Documentation showing the total expenditures for the qualified production activity are greater than or equal to:

(a) Five hundred thousand dollars for a full-length film or made-for-television movie;

(b) Five hundred thousand dollars per over-the-air and streaming television programming episode; or

(c) Twenty-five thousand dollars per short-length film, documentary, animation project, or commercial;

(4) Documentation showing the total amount of individual or loan out company wages or earnings paid during the qualified production activity is five hundred thousand dollars or less;

(5) Documentation showing at least forty percent of the production days for the qualified production activity were in Nebraska and, for full-length films only, at least ten days of production were in Nebraska;

(6) Documentation showing at least forty percent of the below-the-line employees of the qualified production activity were Nebraska residents with expatriates included in the percentage but not exceeding fifteen percent of the total below-the-line employees;

(7) Documentation showing at least fifteen percent of the cast of the qualified production activity were Nebraska residents with expatriates included in the percentage;

(8) If applying for the tax credit under subdivision (3)(c)(i) of section 77-3125, proof of Nebraska residency for all employees whose wages will be part of the calculation of such credit for the qualified production activity; and

(9) Any other information or documentation required by the department.

Laws 2024, LB937, § 9.